Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHILD CARE IMPROVEMENT GRANTS.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for child care improvement grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.20, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (7). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the amount for administrative costs under these appropriations is $0. new text end